da: Stabiliseringsniveau for vandseng: Frit flow; Bevægelsesfri; Semibølgefri; Ultrabølgefri; Bølgefri; Andet
pt-BR: Cama de água nível de estabilização: Fluxo livre; Sem movimento; Semirredutor de ondas; Ultrarredutor de ondas; Sem ondas; Outros
hu: Vízágy stabilizációs szintje: Szabad áramlású; Mozgásmentes; Félig hullámmentes; Extra hullámmentes; Hullámmentes; Egyéb
nb: Stabiliseringsnivå for vannseng: Fri flyt; Bevegelsesfri; Halv-bølgefri; Ultra-bølgefri; Bølgefri; Annet
sl-SI: Raven stabilizacije vodne postelje: Prosti pretok; Brez gibanja; Delno brez valovanja; Popolnoma brez valovanja; Brez valovanja; Drugo
pl: Poziom stabilizacji łóżka wodnego: Brak stabilizacji; Całkowita stabilizacja; Lekka stabilizacja; Bardzo silna stabilizacja; Silna stabilizacja; Inne
de: Stabilisierungsgrad des Wasserbetts: Free Flow; Ruhiggestellt; Leicht beruhigt; Vollberuhigt; Beruhigt; Sonstige
zh-CN: 水床稳定水平: 自由流动; 无波; 半无波; 超无波; 无波; 其他
es: Nivel de estabilización del colchón de agua: Flujo libre; Sin movimiento; Semi sin ondas; Ultra sin ondas; Sin ondas; Otro
zh-TW: 水床穩定等級: 自由流動; 無晃動; 半減波; 超減波; 減波; 其他
el: Επίπεδο σταθεροποίησης στρώματος νερού: Ελεύθερης ροής; Χωρίς κίνηση; Ημι-σταθερό; Εξαιρετικά σταθερό; Σταθερό; Άλλο
en: Waterbed stabilization level: Free flow; Motionless; Semi-waveless; Ultra waveless; Waveless; Other
it: Livello di stabilizzazione del materasso ad acqua: Flusso libero; Assenza di moto; Semi-waveless; Ultra-waveless; Waveless; Altro
th: ระดับการทรงตัวของที่นอนน้ำ: ไหลอิสระ; ไร้การเคลื่อนไหว; ลดคลื่นปานกลาง; ลดคลื่นสูงสุด; ไร้คลื่น; อื่นๆ
cs: Úroveň stabilizace vodní postele: Volný průtok; Bez pohybu; Polotlumená; Silně tlumená; Tlumená; Jiná
nl: Waterbed stabilisatieniveau: Free flow; Bewegingsloos; Semi-waveless; Ultra waveless; Waveless; Overige
pt-PT: Nível de estabilização do colchão de água: Fluxo livre; Imóvel; Semiestável; Ultraestável; Estável; Outro
fr: Niveau de stabilisation du matelas à eau: Flot libre; Immobile; Semi-stabilisé; Ultra-stabilisé; Stabilisé; Autre
sv: Stabiliseringsnivå för vattenmadrassen: Fritt flöde; Helt dämpad; Halvdämpad; Ultradämpad; Dämpad; Övrigt
hr-HR: Razina stabilizacije vodenog kreveta: Slobodan protok; Bez pomicanja; Djelomično prigušeni valovi; Potpuno prigušeni valovi; Prigušeni valovi; Ostalo
ja: ウォーターベッド安定化レベル: フリーフロー; モーションレス; セミウェーブレス; ウルトラウェーブレス; ウェーブレス; その他
bg-BG: Ниво на стабилизация на водния матрак: Свободно движение; Без движение; Полустабилизиран; Максимално стабилизиран; Стабилизиран; Други
ro-RO: Nivelul de stabilizare al patului cu apă: Curgere liberă; Fără mișcare; Reducere parțială a valurilor; Reducere maximă a valurilor; Fără valuri; Altele
ko: 워터베드 안정화 수준: 자유 유동; 모션리스; 세미 웨이브리스; 울트라 웨이브리스; 웨이브리스; 기타
sk-SK: Úroveň stabilizácie vodnej postele: Voľné prelievanie; Úplne pokojné; Čiastočne obmedzené vlnenie; Úplne bez vlnenia; Bez vlnenia; Iné
ru: Уровень стабилизации водяного матраса: Свободный поток; Неподвижный; С частичным гашением волн; Ультрагашение волн; С гашением волн; Другое
tr: Su yatağı stabilizasyon seviyesi: Serbest akışlı; Hareketsiz; Yarı dalgasız; Ultra dalgasız; Dalgasız; Diğer
lt-LT: Vandens lovos stabilizavimo lygis: Laisvas srautas; Nejudantis; Pusiau be bangų; Visiškai be bangų; Be bangų; Kita
fi: Vesisängyn vaimennustaso: Vapaasti aaltoileva; Liikkumaton; Puoliaalloton; Erittäin aalloton; Aalloton; Muu
vi: Mức độ ổn định của giường nước: Dòng chảy tự do; Không chuyển động; Bán chống sóng; Siêu chống sóng; Chống sóng; Khác